Utah statutes.
26-8a-405.   Ground ambulance and paramedic licenses -- Agency notice of approval.

(1)  Beginning January 1, 2004, if the department determines that the application meets the minimum requirements for licensure under Section 26-8a-404, the department shall issue a notice of the approved application to the applicant.

(2)  A current license holder responding to a request for proposal under Section 26-8a-405.2 is considered an approved applicant for purposes of Section 26-8a-405.2 if the current license holder, prior to responding to the request for proposal, submits the following to the department:

(a)  the information required by Subsection 26-8a-404(4)(a)(ii); and

(b)  if the license holder is a private entity, a financial statement, a pro forma budget and necessary letters of credit demonstrating a financial ability to expand service to a new service area; or

(c)  if the license holder is a governmental entity, a letter from the governmental entity's governing body demonstrating the governing body's willingness to financially support the application.



Amended by Chapter 213, 2003 General Session

